Utah statutes.
54-8b-2.2.   Interconnection.
(1) (a) (i)  The commission may require any telecommunications corporation to
interconnect its essential facilities with another telecommunications
corporation that provides public telecommunications services in the same,
adjacent, or overlapping service territory.
(ii)  Interconnecting telecommunications corporations shall permit the mutual
exchange of traffic between their networks without unreasonable blocking or
other unreasonable restrictions on the flow of traffic.  In determining
unreasonable blocking or unreasonable restrictions, the commission shall,
among other things, take into account the necessity and time required for
adapting the network to respond to significant changes in usage patterns.
(b) (i)  Whenever the commission grants a certificate to one or more
telecommunications corporations to provide public telecommunications services
in the same or overlapping service territories, all telecommunications
corporations providing public telecommunications services in the affected area
shall have the right to interconnect with the essential facilities and to
purchase the essential services of all other certificate holders operating in
the same area on a nondiscriminatory and reasonably unbundled basis.
(ii)  Each telecommunications corporation shall permit access to and
interconnection with its essential facilities and the purchase of its
essential services on terms and conditions, including price, no less favorable
than those the telecommunications corporation provides to itself and its
affiliates.
(c)  Nothing in this section shall prevent a telecommunications corporation
from entering into nondiscriminatory agreements for interconnection with its
essential facilities and the purchase and sale of essential services.
(d) (i)  A telecommunications corporation shall file with the commission the
prices, terms, and conditions of any agreement it makes for the
interconnection of essential facilities or the purchase or sale of essential
services.
(ii)  The agreement shall take effect 10 days after filing.
(iii)  Each telecommunications corporation shall allow any other
telecommunications corporation to obtain interconnection with its essential
facilities and to purchase essential services on prices, terms, and conditions
no less favorable than those on file with the commission.
(e)  If there is a dispute over interconnection of essential facilities, the
purchase and sale of essential services, or the planning or provisioning of
facilities or unbundled elements, one or both of the disputing parties may
bring the dispute to the commission, and the commission, by order, shall
resolve the dispute on an expedited basis.
(f)  It is not a discriminatory pricing practice to vary prices to reflect
genuine cost differences.
(2) (a)  The commission shall adopt rules or issue an interim order which
implements by December 31, 1996, the competitive provision of facilities-based
intraLATA toll and local exchange services.
(b)  The rules or interim order shall address those issues the commission
determines are essential for a competing telecommunications corporation to
provide intraLATA toll and local exchange services and necessary to protect
the public interest, including the interconnection with essential facilities
and the purchase and sale of essential services of telecommunications
corporations authorized to provide public telecommunications services in the
same or overlapping service territories on a nondiscriminatory and reasonably
unbundled basis.
(3) (a)  By December 31, 1997, the commission shall adopt additional rules or
issue a final order to implement the competitive provision of facilities-based
intraLATA toll and local exchange services.
(b)  The rules or final order shall address other issues relating to:
(i)  competition for intraLATA toll and local exchange services;
(ii)  blocking, timing of provisioning of unbundled elements, and service
quality standards for interconnecting carriers;
(iii)  the transition to a competitive market; and
(iv)  the protection of the public interest.
(4)  Nothing in this section shall require or prohibit the commission from
ordering changes in dialing patterns for intraLATA toll services.
(5)  If the commission, by order, approves the application of a
telecommunications corporation to provide public telecommunications services
in all or part of the service territory certificated to an incumbent telephone
corporation before the adoption of the rules or final order described in
Subsection (3), the commission may:
(a)  order the interconnection of essential facilities and the purchase and
sale of the essential services of a telecommunications corporation with those
of a competing telecommunications corporation on such terms and conditions and
to the extent necessary to allow the competing telecommunications corporation
to operate under authority granted by the commission; and
(b)  address and resolve, by order, other issues necessary for the competitive
provision of intraLATA toll and local exchange services.
